Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Article 2. Inspector of Mines

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

53A Am. Jur. 2d Mines and Minerals §§ 255 to 289, 328 to 366.

58 C.J.S. Mines and Minerals § 382.

§ 30-2-201.
Appointment and qualifications of inspector and deputy inspectors; terms of office; removal; bond coverage; to devote full time to duties.

There is created the office of the inspector of mines within the department of workforce services. The inspector of mines shall be appointed by the governor by and with the advice and consent of the senate but is subject to the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989. His term of office is two (2) years. His office shall be located in the city of Rock Springs, Sweetwater county, Wyoming. Appointment, term and the filling of vacancies shall be under W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

. His salary shall be determined under W.S.

9-3-101

. He may be discharged at any time during his term by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The inspector shall:

Be a qualified elector of the state and at least thirty-five (35) years of age;

Possess the degree of a graduate engineer from an accredited school, or the equivalent thereof;

Have not less than fifteen (15) years mining experience;

Have experience in underground mining operations, and knowledge of the various problems involving the health and safety of employees in both underground and surface mining, and in the upgrading, processing, milling and beneficiation of the various minerals mined or produced within this state;

Be thoroughly familiar with:

Ventilation methods in mining;

The nature, chemistry, detection and control of noxious, poisonous or explosive gases or emanations;

The dangers incident to blasting and the prevention thereof;

The application and use of electricity in mining operations;

The methods of fire and explosion prevention and control and extinguishment of mine fires;

The health and safety problems involved in small and large scale surface mining operations and related earth-removal or excavation;

The methods of rescue and recovery work following mine disasters; and

State mining laws and mining operations.

Not be an employee, owner or part owner of any mine or mining company in this state;

Possess a mine foreman’s certificate.

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 139, § 4.

Subject to the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989, additional deputy inspectors of mines may be employed, one (1) of which shall be qualified for coal. A deputy inspector of mines for the inspection of mines other than coal mines shall have the same qualifications as the inspector of mines except he shall have had not less than ten (10) years rather than fifteen (15) years of mining experience. A deputy inspector for coal mines shall have the same qualifications as the inspector of mines and also have at least ten (10) years experience in underground mines in this state as part of the total mining experience required.

The inspector of mines and all deputy inspectors shall obtain faithful performance and fidelity bond coverage under W.S.

9-1-102

.

The inspector of mines and all deputy inspectors shall devote full time to the duties of their office.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 35, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 3483; C.S. 1920, § 4406; R.S. 1931, § 70-201; C.S. 1945, § 57-801; Laws 1949, ch. 131, § 1; 1951, ch. 128, §§ 3, 5, 7, 8; 1957, ch. 160, §§ 8, 10; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-46, 30-49, 30-112, 30-114, 30-116, 30-117, 30-204; Laws 1959, ch. 124; § 3; 1963, ch. 93, §§ 1, 2; 1971, ch. 7, § 1; ch. 190, § 15; ch. 215, § 1; ch. 225, § 1; 1973, ch. 215, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

30-2-301

, 30-3-220, 30-3-221, 30-3-223, 30-3-224, 30-4-201; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1981, ch. 135, § 1; 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1989, ch. 139, §§ 2, 4; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1995, ch. 31, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to authority to formulate rules and regulations, see §

30-2-205

.

For authority to close operations for violations relative to operating methods and conditions, see §

30-2-210

.

For duty of board of mines to act in conjunction with inspector, see §

30-2-302

.

For authority to call special meetings of board of mines, see §

30-2-303

.

As to examining board, and rights and duties of inspector with respect thereto, see §§

30-2-306

to

30-2-312

.

For duty of owner or manager to notify inspector as to opening, closing or reopening mines, see §

30-2-405

.

For constitutional provision relative to inspector of mines, see art. 9, § 1, Wyo. Const.

For duty of inspector to visit and report to board of land commissioners lands held under coal and mineral leases, see §

36-6-105

.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in the introductory language of (a).

Wyoming Government Reorganization Act. —

See §§

9-2-1701

, 9-2-1703(a)(x).

§ 30-2-202.
Duties of inspector; duties of deputy inspectors.

The inspector shall:

At reasonable times, day or night, without impeding or obstructing work, enter, inspect and examine any mining operation in development, construction or operation, including the workings and the machinery and may request the assistance of other state agencies;

Collect state mining statistics and report to the governor annually no later than March 31 for the preceding calendar year. The report shall include the statistics and may include recommendations concerning further mining legislation. The statistics in the report shall include for each mine:

A record of all mining accidents preventing victims from returning to work the day following the injury;

Corrective measures taken to prevent the reoccurrence of fatal accidents;

Tons produced;

Number of man hours worked.

Maintain a properly indexed, permanent record of all inspections made and reports filed under this act;

Ensure maps or diagrams of all underground mines in the state are accurately made and filed in his office. Maps, diagrams and any plans filed shall be preserved as a permanent and confidential record. If an adjoining operator can show need for safety reasons, he shall be given access to individual maps, diagrams and plans;

Supervise the deputy inspectors and have full authority over their official activities;

Enforce all laws, rules and regulations pertaining to the safety of mine operations in this state;

Revoke, in writing, any order issued by a deputy inspector clearing a mine or portion thereof of persons, after he makes a personal examination of the mine affected and determines it to be in a safe condition to operate;

To the extent possible, collect, organize and make available studies, information and dates concerning mineral deposits, geological formations and mining and milling operations in this state;

Exercise supervision necessary for enforcement of this act over and inspection of all mining exploration mines, mining operations, upgrading, processing, milling and beneficiation plants within the state including the inspection of drill holes to ensure the holes have been properly abandoned.

Every deputy inspector shall perform inspections and other activities as the inspector directs or as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 80, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2562; C.S. 1910, § 3505; Laws 1919, ch. 126, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4428; Laws 1927, ch. 51, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 23-101; C.S. 1945, § 57-401; Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 7; 1957, ch. 160, §§ 4, 8, 10, 11; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-46, 30-47, 30-49, 30-50, 30-116, 30-131; Laws 1959, ch. 124, § 3; 1963, ch. 93, § 1; 1971, ch. 190, § 15; ch. 215, § 1; ch. 225, § 1; 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 1977, ch. 65, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

30-2-301

,

30-2-302

,

30-2-304

, 30-2-305, 30-3-223,

30-3-402

; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1981, ch. 135, § 1; 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 2001, ch. 91, § 1; 2005, ch. 106, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to mines being excepted from jurisdiction of commissioner of labor and statistics and from provisions concerning safety devices and regulations generally, see §

27-1-104

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(ii)(B), added “to prevent the reoccurrence of fatal accidents”, and in (a)(ii)(D), substituted “man hours” for “man days.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 30-2-101(a)(xv).

§ 30-2-203.
Arbitrary action prohibited; information confidential; exception; interest in mining operations prohibited; discharge for violation of section; additional penalty.

Neither the inspector nor any deputy inspector shall, in any of his functions, act arbitrarily or without just cause. Information obtained in the course of inspections is confidential except where disclosure may be required in enforcement of this act. Grossly negligent release of confidential information acquired in the course of duty, willful discrimination between operators, or knowingly applying to his own material gain knowledge acquired in the course of duty by the inspector or any deputy inspector, is justification for discharge and, in addition, is a misdemeanor punishable upon conviction by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment for a period of not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 30-52; W.S. 1977, §

30-2-307

; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 30-2-101(a)(xv).

§ 30-2-204.
Police powers generally.

The inspector and deputy inspectors shall have and exercise throughout the state all of the powers of peace officers with respect to the enforcement of this act.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 30-51; W.S. 1977, §

30-2-306

; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to peace officers generally, see §§

7-2-101

through

7-2-107

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see §§ 30-2-101(a)(xv).

§ 30-2-205.
Rules and regulations; uniform code of signals; penalty for false signals.

The inspector shall under W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

promulgate rules and regulations to implement this act. Rules and regulations shall be promulgated under this act for all types of mines and mining or for specific types of mines or mining as required to implement this act and to comply with applicable federal law. The rules and regulations shall be no more stringent than federal rules and regulations and shall provide the flexibility necessary in application to specific instances and implement the basic purpose of giving all mining operations and coal mines the greatest freedom consistent with the public interest and the safety of employees and the general public. The inspector shall adopt applicable rules and regulations to the extent necessary to implement the provisions of chapter 3 of this title for which there are no applicable federal rules and regulations. The inspector shall submit all rules and regulations to the council for final approval. The rules implementing the provisions of chapter 3 of this title shall:

To the extent not in conflict with an express provision of chapter 3 of this title, provide for consistency and equivalency but not more stringent than rules and regulations adopted by the MSHA under Title 30 of the code of Federal Regulations, Parts 56, 57, 75 and 77, as may be amended, including provisions incorporated by reference in those rules and regulations; and

Authorize variances to safety rules upon petition by the affected operator and a determination by the inspector that:

An alternative method of achieving the result of the standard exists that will at all times guarantee no less than the same measure of protection afforded by the standard;

Application of the standard will result in a diminution to safety of the miners; or

Failure to grant the variance would be inconsistent with action taken on the same petition by the MSHA.

The inspector of mines shall by rule or regulation:

Adopt and enforce a uniform code of signals;

Determine at which mining operations the code of signals shall be effective;

Prescribe the manner by which the code of signals shall be displayed or distributed.

Any person giving or causing to be given false signals, or riding upon any cage, skip or bucket upon signals that designate to the engineer that no employees are aboard, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00).

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 35, §§ 7, [7a]; C.S. 1910, §§ 3489, 3490; C.S. 1920, §§ 4412, 4413; R.S. 1931, §§ 70-207, 70-208; C.S. 1945, §§ 57-807, 57-808; Laws 1949, ch. 131, §§ 8, 9; 1957, ch. 160, §§ 15, 62; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-53, 30-63, 30-211, 30-212; W.S. 1977, §§

30-2-308

, 30-2-318, 30-4-301, 30-4-302; Laws 1981, ch. 135, § 1; 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1993, ch. 88, § 1; 1995, ch. 31, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

As printed in Laws 1903, ch. 35, an earlier version of this section carried no number. An earlier compiler, for convenience, numbered it “7a” and inserted that number in the history line in brackets.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of "this act," referred to in this section, see § 30-2-101(a)(xv).

§ 30-2-206.
“Interested person” defined; filing of requests prerequisite to notice and information.

A person is an interested person entitled to notice under this act of any action of the inspector including any action regarding rules or regulations if he files with the inspector a request for notice containing his name, address and the name of the person authorized to receive the notice. The request shall be considered filed five (5) days following the date the request is received in the office of the inspector.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 30-55; W.S. 1977, §

30-2-310

; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 30-2-101(a)(xv).

§ 30-2-207.
Access to mining operations, etc.; penalty for refusal of access or obstruction; enforcement by injunction; misrepresentation of facts or information to inspector; obstruction of inspector or deputy.

The inspector or his deputy has access to all mining operations for the purpose of enforcement of this act and all rules and regulations adopted under it. Refusal of access to an authorized person after request is a misdemeanor. Access may be granted by injunction by petition to the court and order to show cause made returnable within ten (10) days or as soon thereafter as the matter may be heard by the court.

Any person in charge of a mine who willfully misrepresents facts or information to the inspector regarding the mine, or who makes any misrepresentation tending to show safety when the reverse is true, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person who willfully obstructs the inspector or his deputy in the execution of his duties under this act is guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 35, § 4; C.S. 1910, § 3486; C.S. 1920, § 4409; R.S. 1931, § 70-204; C.S. 1945, § 57-804; Laws 1949, ch. 131, § 5; 1957, ch. 160, § 21; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-58, 30-207; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-2-313, 30-4-204; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 30-2-101(a)(xv).

§ 30-2-208.
Inspections; when held; duties of inspector or deputy; authority to clear unsafe mine or portion thereof.

The inspector or his deputy shall inspect each operating mine in the state:

At least once every six (6) months;

If any danger to employees exists;

If requested by employees or their representatives.

The inspection shall take place while the mine is in operation, and the inspector or his deputy shall inspect:

The surface plant;

Every working place in the mine;

All active haulageways, travelways, highwalls and airways in their entirety;

Entrances to abandoned workings;

Accessible old workings;

Escapeways and other places where people work or travel, or where dangerous conditions may exist;

Electric equipment and installation;

First-aid equipment;

Ventilation facilities;

Communication installations;

Roof and rib conditions;

Blasting practices.

The inspector or his deputy shall:

Measure the volume of air at the intake and return of the main ventilating current and of each split, and the amount passing through the last open crosscut in each pair or set of entries, and designate where the superintendent or mine foreman shall measure the currents of air as required by this act;

In mines operating more than one (1) shift in a twenty-four (24) hour period, devote sufficient time on the second and third shift to determine conditions and practices related to the health and safety of the employees;

Make tests for gas and oxygen deficiency in each place which he is required to inspect in the mine;

Classify qualifying mines as gassy mines.

If the inspector or his deputy finds imminent or serious danger to the life or health of the employees in a mine, he may clear the mine or any portion thereof of all persons and refuse further entry to any persons, except those necessary to remove the danger and those permitted to participate in investigations under this act, until he determines by actual inspection that the mine or portion thereof involved is in safe operating condition.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, §§ 7, 8; 1957, ch. 160, §§ 10, 11; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-49, 30-50, 30-116, 30-117; Laws 1959, ch. 124, § 3; 1971, ch. 225, § 1; 1973, ch. 215, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

30-2-304

, 30-2-305, 30-3-223, 30-3-224; Laws 1981, ch. 135, § 1; 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 30-2-101(a)(xv).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2d Ed. §
201.06 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-2-209.
Inspections; reports; posting and distribution; interim reports.

The person inspecting the mine shall make an accurate report covering each inspection showing:

The date of inspection;

The condition in which the mine is found;

The extent to which safety laws relating to mines are violated;

The progress made in the improvement of the health and safety of the employees;

The number and cause of injuries and death resulting from accidents in and around the mine;

If any violations of the mine safety laws, rules or regulations are found, the specific section or sections violated, with recommendations for correcting them, and the action taken to eliminate them.

Within seven (7) days after the completion of the inspection, reports shall be posted and distributed as follows:

Two (2) copies to the operator, superintendent or foreman;

One (1) copy to a designated representative of the employees’ organization, if any, of the mine inspected;

One (1) copy posted on a bulletin board at a prominent place on the premises where it can be conveniently read by the employees and to remain posted until the report of the succeeding examination is posted;

One (1) copy to the inspector.

If imminent or serious hazards are found, the person making the inspection shall immediately make an interim report in person or by electronic means.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 8; 1957, ch. 160, § 11; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-50, 30-117; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-2-305, 30-3-224; Laws 1981, ch. 135, § 1; 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

§ 30-2-210.
Notice of violation; correction of condition constituting violation required; penalty upon failure to comply; continuing violations; authority to close operations; right of appeal.

If the inspector or his deputy finds a violation of this act or rules or regulations adopted under it relating to mine operating methods and conditions, he shall notify in writing the person in charge of the mining operation of the condition or method constituting the violation and the provision being violated. The condition or method shall be corrected in five (5) days or other time prescribed by the inspector or his deputy as is reasonable in view of the nature of the condition or method. Allowing a correction period does not prevent the condition or method constituting a violation of this act or a rule or regulation adopted under it. Any person failing to correct a condition or method in the period allowed is guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day during which the condition or method continues uncorrected after notice of correction has been given constitutes a separate violation.

If the condition or method is not corrected within a reasonable time, or if the condition or method constitutes a real, present and substantial danger to the lives or safety of persons, the inspector or his deputy may summarily order the cessation of all activity and close the operation or part thereof as the inspector determines constitutes the danger. The order shall be in writing, specifying the nature of the condition, the basis of the action ordered, the date, time and place of the closing of the operation, and the person to whom the order was delivered. The operator may obtain a review of the order by the inspector or by the district court for the county in which the principal part of the operation is located. Review shall be afforded at the earliest possible date within ten (10) days after the filing of the petition or as soon as the court is available. The matter shall be given precedence on the calendar of the court and the proceedings shall be by petition and order to show cause, returnable within ten (10) days. If any action by the inspector or his deputy is found to have been without justification and to have been taken without reasonable basis, the inspector or his deputy shall be liable on his bond for damages resulting therefrom, including reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the operator in the action.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 30-39; W.S. 1977, §

30-2-105

; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a) substituted “mine” for “mines.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 30-2-101(a)(xv).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
201.06 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-2-211.
Accident investigation; rescue; reports; generally.

The inspector or his deputy shall proceed immediately to the scene of any mine accident causing loss of life or serious personal injury, any mine fire or any mine explosion, investigate, make recommendations, assist as he deems necessary for the present or future safety of the employees, make a complete report and post and distribute the report under W.S. 30-2-209(b).

The inspector or his deputy at the direction of the inspector in consultation with an authorized representative of the mine safety and health administration shall take charge of any necessary mine rescue and recovery work and supervise the reopening of mines that have been sealed or abandoned on account of fire or other cause.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 8; 1957, ch. 160, § 11; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-50, 30-117; W.S. 1977, § 30-2-305; Laws 1981, ch. 135, § 1; 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

§ 30-2-212.
Accident investigation; fatal accidents; procedure; coroner's inquest; notification of inquest.

The inspector, or his deputy when authorized, shall investigate all fatal accidents occurring in connection with mining operations. In his investigation he may compel the attendance of witnesses and administer oaths as if he were a coroner.

The inspector, or his deputy when authorized, may order the coroner of the county in which the accident occurred to hold an inquest into the accident. In choosing a jury for the inquest, the coroner shall empanel at least one (1) experienced miner. It is unlawful for the coroner to release the body of any person killed in a mining accident without notice from the inspector that an inquest is not necessary.

No inquest shall be held into the death of any person killed in connection with mining operations unless the inspector has been first notified that the inquest will take place and been given a chance to participate. In an inquest the inspector may call, examine and cross-examine witnesses, and he may testify as he deems necessary to thoroughly inform the inquest of the causes of death.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 80, § 12; R.S. 1899, § 2575; C.S. 1910, § 3519; C.S. 1920, § 4442; R.S. 1931, § 23-118; C.S. 1945, § 57-424; Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 12; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-51, 30-139; W.S. 1977, §§

30-2-306

, 30-3-410; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 2005, ch. 106, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to coroners' inquests generally, see §§

7-4-201

through

7-4-211

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), deleted the former last sentence, which provided that costs of an investigation of a fatal accident would be paid by the county where the accident occurred.

§ 30-2-213.
Judicial review of decision of inspector; procedure; payment of costs assessed against inspector; appeal.

Any person aggrieved or adversely affected in fact by a decision of the inspector is entitled to judicial review of the decision in the district court for the county in which the property affected is located, or if no real property is involved, in which the person aggrieved or adversely affected in fact resides or has its principal place of business. The procedure to be followed before the district court shall be in accordance with rules adopted by the Wyoming supreme court except any costs assessed against the inspector shall be paid by the county in which the affected property, if any, is located or in which the person aggrieved or adversely affected in fact resides or has its principal place of business. The district court, in its discretion, may appoint three (3) practical, competent and disinterested persons, who shall, under instructions of the court, forthwith examine the mine and make report under oath of the facts as they exist or may have been, together with their opinion thereon. The report shall become absolute, unless exceptions are filed within ten (10) days after notice of the filing of the report to the person aggrieved or adversely affected in fact and the inspector. If exceptions are filed, the court shall hear and determine the exceptions. The decision shall be final and conclusive, subject only to appeal to the supreme court.

Judicial review shall be in accordance with W.S. 16-3-114(c). An interested party may obtain review of any final judgment of the district court under this section by appeal to the supreme court. The appeal shall be taken as in other civil cases.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 80, § 14; R.S. 1899, § 2576; C.S. 1910, § 3520; C.S. 1920, § 4443; R.S. 1931, § 23-119; C.S. 1945, § 57-425; W.S. 1957, § 30-140; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-411; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
201.06 (Matthew Bender).